Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.100

Cities, towns, counties may impose fees different from state building code.

Except for permitting fees for agricultural structures under RCW 19.27.087, nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a city, town, or county of the state from imposing fees different from those set forth in the state building code.

[ 2009 c 362 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 8 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—Performance audit—2009 c 362: See notes following RCW 19.27.087.